Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5563.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The title of Chapter 5-14.1 of the General Laws entitled "The Human
Trafficking Prevention Notice Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
CHAPTER 5-14.1
The Human Trafficking Prevention Notice Act
CHAPTER 5-14.1
THE HUMAN TRAFFICKING PREVENTION NOTICE AND TRAINING ACT
SECTION 2. Section 5-14.1-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-14.1 entitled "The Human
Trafficking Prevention Notice Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-14.1-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the department of business regulation
(1)(2) “Hotel” shall mean any establishment defined in § 5-14-3.
(2)(3) “Human trafficking” means the use of force, fraud, or coercion to obtain some type
of labor or commercial sex act as defined in 22 U.S.C. § 7102 and the commission of an offense
created by §§ 11-67.1-3 through 11-67.1-7.
(4) “Human trafficking awareness training” means training established or approved by the
department that includes, but is not limited to, the following components:
(i) The definition of human trafficking and commercial exploitation of children;

(ii) Guidance on how to identify individuals at risk for trafficking;
(iii) Guidance on how to identify the signs of trafficking and individuals potentially
engaged in the act of trafficking;
(iv) Differences between labor and sex trafficking, specific to the hotel sector;
(v) Guidance on the role of hospitality employees in reporting and responding to this issue;
and
(vi) The contact information for the national human trafficking hotline toll-free number
and text line or contact information for the local law enforcement agency.
(5) “Short-term rental property” means a residential unit used or offered for tourist or
transient use through a hosting platform, as such terms are defined in § 42-63.1-2.
SECTION 3. Chapter 5-14.1 of the General Laws entitled "The Human Trafficking
Prevention Notice Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following sections:
5-14.1-3. Training; policies and procedures.
(a) Every employee of a hotel and every operator of a short-term rental property in this
state shall be required to receive human trafficking awareness training within one hundred eighty
(180) days of employment or the first listing of a short-term rental property on a hosting platform,
and after the first year of employment or listing, annual human trafficking awareness training not
later than December 31.
(b) Every operator of a hotel or short-term rental property in this state shall implement
procedures and adopt policies for the reporting of suspected human trafficking to the national
human trafficking hotline or to a local law enforcement agency.
5-14.1-3. Record keeping.
(a) Any person who operates a hotel or short-term rental property shall maintain records of
employee or operator training. Such records shall be kept on file by the operator of the hotel or
short-term rental property for the period during which the employee is employed by the
establishment or the operator manages the short-term rental property listing, and for one year after
such employment or operation ends. A hotel or short-term rental property operator shall provide
records to the department within a reasonable amount of time, but no later than ten (10) business
days, after such request is made in writing.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC001986
========
LC001986 - Page 2 of 3